Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1246.02
Student loans; sale; resale; conditions.

The Nebraska Investment Council may hold such loans or offer them for sale or resale on such terms and conditions as shall be negotiated with purchasers. Conditions of such sale or resale may be, but shall not be limited to, amounts to be retained for service, degree of servicing requirements, conditions of repurchase and responsibility for collection and reports to the guaranteeing agency of the federal government.

Laws 1971, LB 152, § 3.